Washington statutes.
RCW 18.08.380

Certificates of registration, authorization—Replacement of lost, destroyed, or mutilated certificates.

A new certificate of registration or certificate of authorization to replace any certificate lost, destroyed, or mutilated may be issued by the director. A charge, determined as provided in RCW 43.24.086, shall be made for such issuance.

[ 2002 c 86 s 202; 1985 c 37 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.